Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 2
DISASTER EMERGENCY SERVICES

28-2-101 to 28-2-601. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article repealed, p. 971, § 28, effective July 1, 1984.

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 1 of chapter 24, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Cross references:

For current provisions relating to emergency management, see part 7 of article 33.5 of title 24.